Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.515

Guardianship.

Upon receiving official notice that a court has imposed a guardianship for a person under RCW 11.130.265 and has determined that the person is incompetent for the purpose of rationally exercising the right to vote, if the person subject to guardianship is a registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel that person's voter registration.

[ 2020 c 312 s 728; 2004 c 267 s 125.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.